Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.350

Report of malpractice payments by insurers.

(1) Every institution or organization providing professional liability insurance to physicians shall send a complete report to the commission of all malpractice settlements, awards, or payments in excess of twenty thousand dollars as a result of a claim or action for damages alleged to have been caused by an insured physician's incompetency or negligence in the practice of medicine. Such institution or organization shall also report the award, settlement, or payment of three or more claims during a five-year time period as the result of the alleged physician's incompetence or negligence in the practice of medicine regardless of the dollar amount of the award or payment.

(2) Reports required by this section shall be made within sixty days of the date of the settlement or verdict. Failure to comply with this section is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 333; 1993 c 367 s 17; 1986 c 300 s 6. Formerly RCW 18.72.340.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Legislative findings—Severability—1986 c 300: See notes following RCW 18.57.245.